Utah statutes.
53A-17a-135.   Minimum basic tax rate -- Certified revenue levy.
(1) (a)  In order to qualify for receipt of the state contribution toward the
basic program and as its contribution toward its costs of the basic program,
each school district shall impose a minimum basic tax rate per dollar of
taxable value that generates $273,950,764 in revenues statewide.
(b)  The preliminary estimate for the 2010-11 minimum basic tax rate is
.001513.
(c)  The State Tax Commission shall certify on or before June 22 the rate that
generates $273,950,764 in revenues statewide.
(d)  If the minimum basic tax rate exceeds the certified revenue levy as
defined in Section 53A-17a-103, the state is subject to the notice
requirements of Section 59-2-926.
(2) (a)  The state shall contribute to each district toward the cost of the
basic program in the district that portion which exceeds the proceeds of the
levy authorized under Subsection (1).
(b)  In accord with the state strategic plan for public education and to
fulfill its responsibility for the development and implementation of that
plan, the Legislature instructs the State Board of Education, the governor,
and the Office of Legislative Fiscal Analyst in each of the coming five years
to develop budgets that will fully fund student enrollment growth.
(3) (a)  If the proceeds of the levy authorized under Subsection (1) equal or
exceed the cost of the basic program in a school district, no state
contribution shall be made to the basic program.
(b)  The proceeds of the levy authorized under Subsection (1) which exceed the
cost of the basic program shall be paid into the Uniform School Fund as
provided by law.
